District of Columbia statutes.
31-4416

Mutual companies — Corporations, boards, or associations as agents or members thereof.

Public or private corporations, boards, or associations of the District or elsewhere may make applications, enter into agreements for, hold policies in, and become members of mutual companies. Any officer, stockholder, trustee, or legal representative of any such corporation, board, association, or of an estate may be recognized as acting for or on its behalf, but shall not be personally liable by reason of acting in such representative capacity.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1148, ch. 672, ch. III, § 16

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-616.
1973 Ed., § 35-516.